Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-3] Protection of persons secondarily
liable. (a) Whenever:

(1) The enforcement of any obligation or liability;

(2) The prosecution of any suit or proceeding;

(3) The entry or enforcement of any order, writ,
judgment, or decree; or

(4) The performance of any other act;

may be stayed, postponed, or suspended, the stay,
postponement, or suspension may likewise be granted in the discretion of the
court to sureties, guarantors, endorsers, accommodation makers, and others,
whether primarily or secondarily subject to the obligation or liability that is
stayed, postponed, or suspended.

(b) When a judgment or decree is vacated or
set aside in whole or in part as provided in this chapter, the court in its
discretion may likewise set aside and vacate it as to any surety, guarantor,
endorser, accommodation maker, or other person, whether primarily or
secondarily liable upon the contract or liability for the enforcement of which
the judgment or decree was entered.

(c) Whenever by reason of the military service
of a principal, the sureties of a criminal bail bond are prevented from
enforcing the attendance of their principal and performing their obligation,
the court shall not enforce the provisions of the bond during the military
service of that principal. The court, in accordance with principles of equity
and justice, may discharge those sureties and exonerate the bail either during
or after such service.

(d) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a
waiver in writing of the benefits afforded by subsections (a) and (b) by any
surety, guarantor, endorser, accommodation maker, or other person whether
primarily or secondarily liable upon the obligation or liability, except that
no such waiver shall be valid unless it is executed as an instrument separate from
the obligation or liability in respect of which it applies. No such waiver
shall be valid after the beginning of the period of military service if
executed by:

(1) An individual who subsequent to the execution of
that waiver becomes a person in military service; or

(2) A dependent of the individual. [L 1994, c 257, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next